Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2604
Appointment of arbitrators by court.

If the arbitration agreement provides a method of appointment of arbitrators, this method shall be followed. In the absence thereof, or if the agreed method fails or for any reason cannot be followed, or when an arbitrator appointed fails or is unable to act and a successor has not been duly appointed, the court on application of a party shall appoint one or more arbitrators, except that the court shall always appoint an odd number of arbitrators. An arbitrator so appointed has all the powers of one specifically named in the agreement. Upon appointment an arbitrator shall disclose his or her hourly or daily rate for arbitration services.

Laws 1987, LB 71, § 4.